Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska66-1817
Completion and dedication of property.

(1) Any jurisdictional utility property may be deemed to be completed and dedicated to commercial service if construction of the property will be commenced and completed in one year or less.

(2) The commission may determine that property of a jurisdictional utility which has not been completed and dedicated to commercial service may be deemed to be used and useful in the utility's service to the public.

Laws 2003, LB 790, § 17.